Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 5. Driver's Education Programs

§ 21-3-501.
Driver's education programs.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, any school district providing instruction in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) for driver’s education shall upon application to the department of transportation through the department of education in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, be reimbursed an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount actually expended by the district during the immediately preceding school year for driver’s education programs relating to alcohol-impaired driving. Reimbursement under this section shall be paid by the department of transportation to the qualifying district on or before October 15 of any school year.

Reimbursement to school districts under this section shall be limited by the amount of federal or state funds made available for this program for any school year.

Application under subsection (a) of this section shall be in a manner and form prescribed by department of transportation rule and regulation, shall include driver’s education program expenditures for the applicable reporting period and shall be submitted to the department of education not later than September 1 of the appropriate school year. Expenditures qualifying for reimbursement under this section shall be subject to guidelines and standards established by department of transportation rule and regulation.

The school finance section of the department of audit established under W.S.

9-1-513

shall conduct periodic audits of the information submitted within applications filed under this section and shall include the resulting audit findings within the department’s annual report to the legislature required by W.S.

9-1-513

(b)(viii).

The department of education in consultation with the department of transportation shall provide by rule and regulation standards for driver education programs in high schools, private schools as defined in W.S. 21-4-101(a)(iii), community colleges, boards of cooperative educational services, community education programs and drivers’ education schools. The department of transportation in consultation with the department of education shall adopt procedures by rule and regulation to implement the provisions of W.S. 31-7-108(a).

The department shall designate and may employ a state coordinator of driver education programs to provide oversight of all driver education programs throughout the state. The responsibilities of the coordinator shall include, but not be limited to:

Assuring quality driver education programs in this state;

Serving as a liaison between the department of education and the department of transportation;

Promoting driver safety throughout the state; and

Reviewing and approving driver education programs in accordance with the rules and regulations issued by the departments of education and transportation.

No driver education program identified in subsection (e) of this section shall issue a certificate for purposes of W.S. 31-7-108(a) unless the school’s program has first been reviewed and issued a certificate of approval by the state coordinator of driver education. Certificates of approval shall be issued only upon written application of the school, and shall be issued for such periods and in such manner as provided in rules and regulations of the department of education.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 209, § 1; 2006, ch. 25, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (e) through (g).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 206, § 1, provides:

“(a) Supplemental financial assistance shall be available to school districts through the department of education for the provision of driver's education programs. Financial assistance under this section shall be in addition to and shall not be considered in determining the school foundation program amount under the education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S.

21-13-309

. To qualify for supplemental assistance under this section, the driver's education program provided by a district shall be certified by the state coordinator of driver education programs under W.S.

21-3-501

and shall be in compliance with guidelines and standards prescribed by rule and regulation of the department of education under W.S.

21-3-501

. Supplemental assistance under this section shall be limited to reimbursement for students within a school who are eligible for participation in the free and reduced price lunch program under the national school lunch program established by 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq.

“(b) On or before September 15, 2009, each school district may apply to the department of education for financial assistance under this section on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department. In addition to verification that the district's driver's education program is certified under W.S.

21-3-501

and verification of student eligibility as provided in subsection (a) of this section, application shall include an estimate of the number of eligible students enrolling and completing the district's program during the 2009-2010 school year, including the 2009 summer session, together with any additional information which may be required by the department.

“(c) Financial assistance under this section shall be computed by the department for each eligible applicant district by multiplying the number of estimated eligible students enrolling and completing the district's certified driver's education program during school year 2009-2010, including the 2009 summer session, by one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00), less any per student fee which may be assessed by the district for enrolling in the driver's education program. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the amount computed under this subsection, based upon estimated eligible student enrollment, shall be paid by the department to each eligible applicant district on or before October 15.

“(d) Not later than June 15, 2010, each district receiving supplemental financial assistance under subsection (c) of this section shall report the actual number of eligible students enrolling and completing its certified driver's education program during school year 2009-2010, including the 2009 summer session. Based upon the report submitted by each recipient district and on or before June 30, 2010, the department shall pay each district the remaining twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount computed under subsection (c) of this section, adjusted to reflect actual program enrollment and completion. If the appropriation from the foundation program account under subsection (f) of this section is insufficient to make payments under this subsection, the department shall make a pro rata reduction in the final payment made to all districts under this subsection.

“(e) In carrying out this section, the department shall promulgate necessary rules and regulations and shall notify districts of supplemental financial assistance available under this section in sufficient time for compliance with district application requirements imposed under this section. On or before December 1, 2009, the department shall report to the joint education interim committee on financial assistance distributions made under this section based upon estimated student enrollment numbers, and shall provide recommendations to the committee on program continuation.

“(f) Two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the department of education for distribution to districts as supplemental assistance in accordance with this section. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2010.”